Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1726.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "work permit" in section 2 of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *["Work permit." A transferable work permit allowing employment of a minor.]123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *Section 2. Sections 4(d)(3), 5(c)(5) and 8(a), (b) and (d)(3) of the act are amended to read:Section 4. Occupations and establishments.* * *(d) Occupations for minors less than 14 years of age.--An individual less than 14 years of age may be employed as follows:* * *(3) An individual who is at least 12 years of age may be employed as a youth sports official [and shall not be required to procure a work permit]. Youth sports officials who are 12 and 13 years of age shall be subject to the same limitations established in section 3 for individuals who are 14 and 15 years of age.Section 5. Employment of minors in a performance.* * *(c) Entertainment permits.--The following shall apply:* * *[(5) The work permit requirements of section 9 do not apply to the issuance of permits under this section.]* * *Section 8. Duties of employer.(a) [Work permits and parental] Parental authorization.--(1) Unless a minor has the items listed in paragraph (2), a minor may not be employed or permitted to work:(i) in, about or in connection with an establishment; or(ii) in an occupation.(2) To be employed, a minor under 16 years of age must have [all of the following:20250HB1726PN2126 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A work permit.(ii) For individuals who are under 16 years of age,] a written statement by the minor's parent or legal guardian acknowledging understanding of the duties and hours of employment and granting permission to work subject to the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(3) Before employing a minor, an employer shall [do all of the following:(i) Verify the work permit under paragraph (2)(i).(ii) Receive the verified statement under paragraph (2)(ii).] receive the verified statement under paragraph (2).[(4) An individual who is more than 16 years of age employed in the distribution, sale, exposing or offering for sale of any newspaper, or any minor who can demonstrate that he is working independently of the newspaper publisher in this work, shall not be required to procure a work permit.(b) Notification.--The employer shall notify the issuing officer in writing of the employment of a minor and shall detail the normal duties and hours of employment within five days after the beginning of employment and shall include the age and permit number of the minor. On termination of employment of a minor, the employer shall notify the issuing officer within five days of the final day of employment that the minor no longer is employed by the employer.]* * *(d) Records.--An employer shall maintain the following records at the workplace:* * *20250HB1726PN2126 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) For each minor, the employer shall keep a copy of [the work permit,] the original verified permission statement required in subsection (a) [and a copy of the letter sent to the issuing officer announcing the employment of the minor].* * *Section 3. Section 9 of the act is repealed:[Section 9. Work permit.(a) Form and content.--(1) A work permit shall be issued on a wallet-sized form prescribed by the department. The work permit shall contain the following information related to the minor:(i) Name.(ii) Sex.(iii) Date and place of birth.(iv) Place of residence.(v) Color of hair and eyes.(vi) Any physical work restrictions.(2) The work permit shall certify that:(i) the holder has personally appeared before the issuing officer and has been examined;(ii) all papers required by law have been examined, approved and filed; and(iii) all conditions and requirements for issuing a permit have been fulfilled.(3) The work permit shall be signed by the minor.(4) The work permit shall bear a number, the date of issuance and the signature of the issuing officer.(b) Application.--(1) Documentation shall be as follows:(i) Except as set forth under subparagraph (ii), the 20250HB1726PN2126 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application for a work permit must be verified as follows:(A) The applicant's parent or legal guardian must sign the application.(B) In lieu of a signature under clause (A), the applicant may execute a statement before a notary public or other person authorized to administer oaths attesting to the accuracy of the facts set forth in the application on a form prescribed by the department. The statement shall be attached to the application.(ii) Subparagraph (i) does not apply if the applicant can demonstrate official proof of high school graduation.(iii) The issuing officer shall not issue a work permit until the issuing officer has received, examined, approved and filed the following papers which verify the applicant's age:(A) If proof of age is an official document or record of the Commonwealth or government of another state or governmental subdivision of another state, it need not be filed if the issuing officer records the information necessary to enable the document or record to be located at the place where it is filed. If proof of age is other than an official document or record of the Commonwealth or government of another state or governmental subdivision of another state, the following is the order of preference for acceptable proof under this clause:(I) An attested transcript of the birth 20250HB1726PN2126 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certificate, filed according to law with a register of vital statistics or other officer charged with the duty of recording births.(II) A certified baptismal certificate or transcript of the record of baptism showing the date of birth.(III) A passport showing the age of the minor.(IV) Any certified documentary record of age other than a school record or an affidavit of age, which appears to the satisfaction of the issuing officer to be sufficient evidence of age.(V) The signed statement of a physician, physician's assistant or nurse practitioner, approved by the board of school directors, stating that, after examination, it is the opinion of the individual signing the statement that the applicant has attained the age required by law for the occupation in which the applicant expects to engage. The statement must be accompanied by an affidavit signed by the applicant's parent or legal guardian or, if there is no parent or legal guardian, by the applicant's next friend and certifying to the name, date and place of birth of the applicant and that the individual signing the statement is unable to produce any of the proofs of age specified in subclauses (I), (II), (III) and (IV).(B) (Reserved).20250HB1726PN2126 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Examination shall be as follows:(i) Except as set forth under subparagraphs (ii) and (iii), a work permit shall not be issued until the applicant has personally appeared before and has been examined by the issuing officer.(ii) Subparagraph (i) does not apply if the applicant can demonstrate official proof of high school graduation.(iii) The issuing officer may allow the applicant to appear by video conference or other electronic means, in lieu of requiring the physical presence of the applicant.(c) Issuance.--If all application requirements are met, a work permit shall be issued by an issuing officer unless it is the issuing officer's judgment that the applicant cannot maintain adequate academic achievement if permitted to work during the school year.(d) Revocation.--An issuing officer may revoke a work permit if it is the issuing officer's judgment that the applicant cannot maintain adequate academic achievement if permitted to work during the school year.(e) Cooperation.--The issuing officer shall cooperate with an enforcement officer with investigation and enforcement of this act.]Section 4. Sections 10(d) and (e) and 14(c) of the act are amended to read:Section 10. Administration.* * *[(d) Duties of school districts.--School districts shall administer applications and issuance of work permits under section 9 and shall notify the department of alleged violations 20250HB1726PN2126 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this act.](e) Suspected violations of age requirements.--(1) If an enforcement officer has reason to believe that an individual [working without a work permit is a minor or that a minor with a work permit] is working in violation of the age restrictions set forth under this act, the officer may demand that the person employing the individual within ten days:(i) furnish to the officer proof of age; or(ii) cease to employ or permit the individual to work.(2) Proof of a demand under paragraph (1) and of failure to comply with paragraph (1)(i) constitutes prima facie evidence of the illegal employment of a minor.(3) Compliance with this subsection does not relieve a person from liability under section 11.Section 14. Newspaper delivery.* * *[(c) Work permit.--An individual who is more than 16 years of age employed in the distribution, sale, offering for sale of any newspaper, or any minor who can demonstrate that he is working independently of the newspaper publisher, shall not be required to procure a work permit.]Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1726PN2126 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324